Illinois, session 104th, HB1199.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Section 18-105.1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/18-105.1 new)7    Sec. 18-105.1. Limit on property tax extensions. 8Notwithstanding any other provision of law, beginning in 9taxable year 2026, no county clerk may extend against any 10property an annual property tax that exceeds the amount 11generated by multiplying the property tax liability for the 12property in the immediately preceding taxable year by one plus 13the percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index 14for the 12-month period ending in September of the immediately 15preceding taxable year, unless the increase in the property 16tax liability over the immediately preceding taxable year is 17the result of improvements to the property or the result of the 18removal of one or more exemptions that were granted with 19respect to the property for the immediately preceding taxable 20year. If the county clerk is required to reduce the amount 21extended against any property under the provisions of this 22Section, the county clerk shall proportionally reduce the 23extension for each taxing district that levies property taxes   HB1199- 2 -LRB104 06174 HLH 16208 b1against the property. As used in this Section, "consumer price 2index" means the index published by the Bureau of Labor 3Statistics of the United States Department of Labor that 4measures the average change in prices of goods and services 5purchased by all urban consumers, United States city average, 6all items, 1982-84 = 100. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.